Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.310

Attendance in school district of choice—Impact on existing cooperative arrangements.

Any school district board of directors may make arrangements with the board of directors of other districts for children to attend the school district of choice. Nothing under RCW 28A.225.220 and 28A.225.225 is intended to adversely affect agreements between school districts in effect on April 11, 1990.

[ 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 209.]

NOTES:

Captions, headings not law—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: See note following RCW 28A.225.225.

Finding—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28A.225.220.